dictionaries/isv_lat_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX CZ Y 62
SFX CZ ti l .
SFX CZ ti la .
SFX CZ ti lo .
SFX CZ ti li .
SFX CZ eti nu .
SFX CZ eti nem .
SFX CZ eti neš .
SFX CZ eti ne .
SFX CZ eti nemo .
SFX CZ eti nete .
SFX CZ eti nut .
SFX CZ ti h .
SFX CZ ti še .
SFX CZ ti hmo .
SFX CZ ti ste .
SFX CZ ti hu .
SFX CZ eti ni .
SFX CZ eti nimo .
SFX CZ eti nite .
SFX CZ eti nuči .
SFX CZ eti nučego .
SFX CZ eti nučemu .
SFX CZ eti nučim .
SFX CZ eti nučem .
SFX CZ eti nučih .
SFX CZ eti nučimi .
SFX CZ eti nuča .
SFX CZ eti nuču .
SFX CZ eti nučej .
SFX CZ eti nučeju .
SFX CZ eti nuče .
SFX CZ eti nemy .
SFX CZ eti nemogo .
SFX CZ eti nemomu .
SFX CZ eti nemym .
SFX CZ eti nemom .
SFX CZ eti nemo .
SFX CZ eti nema .
SFX CZ eti nemu .
SFX CZ eti nemoj .
SFX CZ eti nemoju .
SFX CZ eti nemi .
SFX CZ eti neme .
SFX CZ eti nemyh .
SFX CZ eti nemym .
SFX CZ eti nemymi .
SFX CZ ti vši .
SFX CZ ti všego .
SFX CZ ti všemu .
SFX CZ ti všim .
SFX CZ ti všem .
SFX CZ ti vših .
SFX CZ ti všimi .
SFX CZ ti vša .
SFX CZ ti všu .
SFX CZ ti všej .
SFX CZ ti všeju .
SFX CZ ti vše .
SFX CZ i y .
SFX CZ i a .
SFX CZ i o .
SFX CZ i je .

SFX Ca Y 11
SFX Ca 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Ca 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX Ca el li/xPxE .
SFX Ca el la/xPxE .
SFX Ca el lov/xPxE .
SFX Ca el lu/xPxE .
SFX Ca el lah/xPxE .
SFX Ca el lam/xPxE .
SFX Ca el lom/xPxE .
SFX Ca el lami/xPxE .
SFX Ca el le/xPxE .

SFX Cb Y 11
SFX Cb 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Cb a o/xPxBxO .
SFX Cb a y/xPxE .
SFX Cb a u/xPxE .
SFX Cb ma em/xPxE .
SFX Cb a ě/xPxE .
SFX Cb 0 h/xPxE .
SFX Cb 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Cb a oju/xPxE .
SFX Cb 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX Cb a o/xPxE .

SFX Cc Y 28
SFX Cc 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Cc y o/xBxPxE .
SFX Cc y a/xPxE .
SFX Cc y ogo/xPxE .
SFX Cc y u/xPxE .
SFX Cc y oj/xPxE .
SFX Cc y om/xPxE .
SFX Cc y omu/xPxE .
SFX Cc 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Cc y oju/xPxE .
SFX Cc y i/xPxE .
SFX Cc y e/xPxE .
SFX Cc 0 h/xPxE .
SFX Cc 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX Cc hy šějši/zz .
SFX Cc hy šějšego/zz .
SFX Cc hy šějšemu/zz .
SFX Cc hy šějšim/zz .
SFX Cc hy šějšem/zz .
SFX Cc hy šějše/zz .
SFX Cc hy šějša/zz .
SFX Cc hy šějšu/zz .
SFX Cc hy šějšej/zz .
SFX Cc hy šějšeju/zz .
SFX Cc hy šějših/zz .
SFX Cc hy šějšim/zz .
SFX Cc hy šějšimi/zz .
SFX Cc hy šeje/zz .

SFX Cd Y 80
SFX Cd ti l .
SFX Cd ti la .
SFX Cd ti lo .
SFX Cd ti li .
SFX Cd kati ču .
SFX Cd kati čem .
SFX Cd kati češ .
SFX Cd kati če .
SFX Cd kati čemo .
SFX Cd kati čete .
SFX Cd kati čut .
SFX Cd ti h .
SFX Cd ti še .
SFX Cd ti hmo .
SFX Cd ti ste .
SFX Cd ti hu .
SFX Cd kati či .
SFX Cd kati čimo .
SFX Cd kati čite .
SFX Cd kati čuči .
SFX Cd kati čučego .
SFX Cd kati čučemu .
SFX Cd kati čučim .
SFX Cd kati čučem .
SFX Cd kati čučih .
SFX Cd kati čučimi .
SFX Cd kati čuča .
SFX Cd kati čuču .
SFX Cd kati čučej .
SFX Cd kati čučeju .
SFX Cd kati čuče .
SFX Cd kati čemy .
SFX Cd kati čemogo .
SFX Cd kati čemomu .
SFX Cd kati čemym .
SFX Cd kati čemom .
SFX Cd kati čemo .
SFX Cd kati čema .
SFX Cd kati čemu .
SFX Cd kati čemoj .
SFX Cd kati čemoju .
SFX Cd kati čemi .
SFX Cd kati čeme .
SFX Cd kati čemyh .
SFX Cd kati čemym .
SFX Cd kati čemymi .
SFX Cd ti vši .
SFX Cd ti všego .
SFX Cd ti všemu .
SFX Cd ti všim .
SFX Cd ti všem .
SFX Cd ti vših .
SFX Cd ti všimi .
SFX Cd ti vša .
SFX Cd ti všu .
SFX Cd ti všej .
SFX Cd ti všeju .
SFX Cd ti vše .
SFX Cd ti ny .
SFX Cd ti nogo .
SFX Cd ti nomu .
SFX Cd ti nym .
SFX Cd ti nom .
SFX Cd ti ni .
SFX Cd ti ne .
SFX Cd ti nyh .
SFX Cd ti nymi .
SFX Cd ti na .
SFX Cd ti nu .
SFX Cd ti noj .
SFX Cd ti noju .
SFX Cd ti no .
SFX Cd ti nje/xPxE .
SFX Cd ti nja/xPxE .
SFX Cd ti nju/xPxE .
SFX Cd ti njem/xPxE .
SFX Cd ti nij/xPxE .
SFX Cd ti njam/xPxE .
SFX Cd ti njami/xPxE .
SFX Cd ti njah/xPxE .

SFX Ce Y 68
SFX Ce ti l .
SFX Ce ti la .
SFX Ce ti lo .
SFX Ce ti li .
SFX Ce sěti šu .
SFX Ce ěti im .
SFX Ce ěti iš .
SFX Ce ěti i .
SFX Ce ěti imo .
SFX Ce ěti ite .
SFX Ce ěti et .
SFX Ce ti h .
SFX Ce ti še .
SFX Ce ti hmo .
SFX Ce ti ste .
SFX Ce ti hu .
SFX Ce ěti eči .
SFX Ce ěti eča .
SFX Ce ěti eče .
SFX Ce ěti imy .
SFX Ce ěti imogo .
SFX Ce ěti imomu .
SFX Ce ěti imym .
SFX Ce ěti imom .
SFX Ce ěti imo .
SFX Ce ěti ima .
SFX Ce ěti imu .
SFX Ce ěti imoj .
SFX Ce ěti imoju .
SFX Ce ěti imi .
SFX Ce ěti ime .
SFX Ce ěti imyh .
SFX Ce ěti imym .
SFX Ce ěti imymi .
SFX Ce ti vši .
SFX Ce ti všego .
SFX Ce ti všemu .
SFX Ce ti všim .
SFX Ce ti všem .
SFX Ce ti vših .
SFX Ce ti všimi .
SFX Ce ti vša .
SFX Ce ti všu .
SFX Ce ti všej .
SFX Ce ti všeju .
SFX Ce ti vše .
SFX Ce ti ny .
SFX Ce ti nogo .
SFX Ce ti nomu .
SFX Ce ti nym .
SFX Ce ti nom .
SFX Ce ti ni .
SFX Ce ti ne .
SFX Ce ti nyh .
SFX Ce ti nymi .
SFX Ce ti na .
SFX Ce ti nu .
SFX Ce ti noj .
SFX Ce ti noju .
SFX Ce ti no .
SFX Ce ti nje/xPxE .
SFX Ce ti nja/xPxE .
SFX Ce ti nju/xPxE .
SFX Ce ti njem/xPxE .
SFX Ce ti nij/xPxE .
SFX Ce ti njam/xPxE .
SFX Ce ti njami/xPxE .
SFX Ce ti njah/xPxE .

SFX Cf Y 17
SFX Cf 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Cf o o/xPxBxO .
SFX Cf o a/xPxE .
SFX Cf o esa/xPxE .
SFX Cf o ese/xPxE .
SFX Cf o 0 .
SFX Cf o es/xPxE .
SFX Cf o u/xPxE .
SFX Cf o esi/xPxE .
SFX Cf o ah/xPxE .
SFX Cf o esah/xPxE .
SFX Cf o am/xPxE .
SFX Cf o esam/xPxE .
SFX Cf 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Cf o esem/xPxE .
SFX Cf o ami/xPxE .
SFX Cf o esami/xPxE .

SFX Cg Y 9
SFX Cg 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Cg o o/xPxBxO .
SFX Cg o a/xPxE .
SFX Cg ko ok/xPxE .
SFX Cg o u/xPxE .
SFX Cg o ah/xPxE .
SFX Cg o am/xPxE .
SFX Cg 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Cg o ami/xPxE .

SFX Ch Y 3
SFX Ch sot istah .
SFX Ch sot istam .
SFX Ch sot justami .

SFX Ci Y 72
SFX Ci sti tl .
SFX Ci sti tla .
SFX Ci sti tlo .
SFX Ci sti tli .
SFX Ci sti tu .
SFX Ci sti tem .
SFX Ci sti teš .
SFX Ci sti te .
SFX Ci sti temo .
SFX Ci sti tete .
SFX Ci sti tut .
SFX Ci sti teh .
SFX Ci sti teše .
SFX Ci sti tehmo .
SFX Ci sti teste .
SFX Ci sti tehu .
SFX Ci sti ti .
SFX Ci sti timo .
SFX Ci sti tite .
SFX Ci sti tuči .
SFX Ci sti tučego .
SFX Ci sti tučemu .
SFX Ci sti tučim .
SFX Ci sti tučem .
SFX Ci sti tučih .
SFX Ci sti tučimi .
SFX Ci sti tuča .
SFX Ci sti tuču .
SFX Ci sti tučej .
SFX Ci sti tučeju .
SFX Ci sti tuče .
SFX Ci sti tomy .
SFX Ci sti tomogo .
SFX Ci sti tomomu .
SFX Ci sti tomym .
SFX Ci sti tomom .
SFX Ci sti tomo .
SFX Ci sti toma .
SFX Ci sti tomu .
SFX Ci sti tomoj .
SFX Ci sti tomoju .
SFX Ci sti tomi .
SFX Ci sti tome .
SFX Ci sti tomyh .
SFX Ci sti tomym .
SFX Ci sti tomymi .
SFX Ci sti tomo .
SFX Ci sti tši .
SFX Ci sti tša .
SFX Ci sti tše .
SFX Ci sti teny .
SFX Ci sti tenogo .
SFX Ci sti tenomu .
SFX Ci sti tenym .
SFX Ci sti tenom .
SFX Ci sti teni .
SFX Ci sti tene .
SFX Ci sti tenyh .
SFX Ci sti tenymi .
SFX Ci sti tena .
SFX Ci sti tenu .
SFX Ci sti tenoj .
SFX Ci sti tenoju .
SFX Ci sti teno .
SFX Ci sti tenje/xPxE .
SFX Ci sti tenja/xPxE .
SFX Ci sti tenju/xPxE .
SFX Ci sti tenjem/xPxE .
SFX Ci sti tenij/xPxE .
SFX Ci sti tenjam/xPxE .
SFX Ci sti tenjami/xPxE .
SFX Ci sti tenjah/xPxE .

SFX Cj Y 11
SFX Cj j 0 .
SFX Cj ej a .
SFX Cj j go .
SFX Cj ej u .
SFX Cj j m .
SFX Cj j mu .
SFX Cj ej im .
SFX Cj 0 u .
SFX Cj ej i .
SFX Cj ej ih .
SFX Cj ej imi .

SFX Ck Y 4
SFX Ck 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Ck 0 e/xPxBxO .
SFX Ck 0 i/xPxE .
SFX Ck 0 ju/xPxE .

SFX Cl Y 5
SFX Cl 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Cl i o/xPxBxO .
SFX Cl i yh/xPxE .
SFX Cl i ym/xPxE .
SFX Cl i ymi/xPxE .

SFX Cm Y 9
SFX Cm 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Cm o o/xPxBxO .
SFX Cm o a/xPxE .
SFX Cm lo ol/xPxE .
SFX Cm o u/xPxE .
SFX Cm o ah/xPxE .
SFX Cm o am/xPxE .
SFX Cm 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Cm o ami/xPxE .

SFX Cn Y 80
SFX Cn ti l .
SFX Cn ti la .
SFX Cn ti lo .
SFX Cn ti li .
SFX Cn evati uju .
SFX Cn evati ujem .
SFX Cn evati uješ .
SFX Cn evati uje .
SFX Cn evati ujemo .
SFX Cn evati ujete .
SFX Cn evati ujut .
SFX Cn ti h .
SFX Cn ti še .
SFX Cn ti hmo .
SFX Cn ti ste .
SFX Cn ti hu .
SFX Cn evati uj .
SFX Cn evati ujmo .
SFX Cn evati ujte .
SFX Cn evati ujuči .
SFX Cn evati ujučego .
SFX Cn evati ujučemu .
SFX Cn evati ujučim .
SFX Cn evati ujučem .
SFX Cn evati ujučih .
SFX Cn evati ujučimi .
SFX Cn evati ujuča .
SFX Cn evati ujuču .
SFX Cn evati ujučej .
SFX Cn evati ujučeju .
SFX Cn evati ujuče .
SFX Cn evati ujemy .
SFX Cn evati ujemogo .
SFX Cn evati ujemomu .
SFX Cn evati ujemym .
SFX Cn evati ujemom .
SFX Cn evati ujemo .
SFX Cn evati ujema .
SFX Cn evati ujemu .
SFX Cn evati ujemoj .
SFX Cn evati ujemoju .
SFX Cn evati ujemi .
SFX Cn evati ujeme .
SFX Cn evati ujemyh .
SFX Cn evati ujemym .
SFX Cn evati ujemymi .
SFX Cn ti vši .
SFX Cn ti všego .
SFX Cn ti všemu .
SFX Cn ti všim .
SFX Cn ti všem .
SFX Cn ti vših .
SFX Cn ti všimi .
SFX Cn ti vša .
SFX Cn ti všu .
SFX Cn ti všej .
SFX Cn ti všeju .
SFX Cn ti vše .
SFX Cn ti ny .
SFX Cn ti nogo .
SFX Cn ti nomu .
SFX Cn ti nym .
SFX Cn ti nom .
SFX Cn ti ni .
SFX Cn ti ne .
SFX Cn ti nyh .
SFX Cn ti nymi .
SFX Cn ti na .
SFX Cn ti nu .
SFX Cn ti noj .
SFX Cn ti noju .
SFX Cn ti no .
SFX Cn ti nje/xPxE .
SFX Cn ti nja/xPxE .
SFX Cn ti nju/xPxE .
SFX Cn ti njem/xPxE .
SFX Cn ti nij/xPxE .
SFX Cn ti njam/xPxE .
SFX Cn ti njami/xPxE .
SFX Cn ti njah/xPxE .

SFX Co Y 11
SFX Co 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Co 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX Co 0 i/xPxE .
SFX Co 0 a/xPxE .
SFX Co 0 ov/xPxE .
SFX Co 0 u/xPxE .
SFX Co 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX Co 0 am/xPxE .
SFX Co 0 om/xPxE .
SFX Co 0 ami/xPxE .
SFX Co g že/xPxE .

SFX Cp Y 9
SFX Cp 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Cp 0 e/xPxBxO .
SFX Cp olj lj/xPxE .
SFX Cp olj lja/xPxE .
SFX Cp 0 a/xPxE .
SFX Cp olj lju/xPxE .
SFX Cp 0 u/xPxE .
SFX Cp olj ljem/xPxE .
SFX Cp 0 em/xPxE .

SFX Cq Y 13
SFX Cq y o .
SFX Cq y a .
SFX Cq y ogo .
SFX Cq y u .
SFX Cq y oj .
SFX Cq y om .
SFX Cq y omu .
SFX Cq 0 m .
SFX Cq y oju .
SFX Cq y i .
SFX Cq y e .
SFX Cq 0 h .
SFX Cq 0 mi .

SFX Cr Y 21
SFX Cr 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Cr 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX Cr oz z/xPxE .
SFX Cr oz zy/xPxE .
SFX Cr 0 y/xPxE .
SFX Cr oz za/xPxE .
SFX Cr 0 a/xPxE .
SFX Cr oz zov/xPxE .
SFX Cr 0 ov/xPxE .
SFX Cr oz zu/xPxE .
SFX Cr 0 u/xPxE .
SFX Cr oz zah/xPxE .
SFX Cr 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX Cr oz zam/xPxE .
SFX Cr 0 am/xPxE .
SFX Cr oz zom/xPxE .
SFX Cr 0 om/xPxE .
SFX Cr oz zami/xPxE .
SFX Cr 0 ami/xPxE .
SFX Cr oz ze/xPxE .
SFX Cr 0 e/xPxE .

SFX Cs Y 3
SFX Cs i ěh .
SFX Cs i ěm .
SFX Cs i ěmi .

SFX Ct Y 80
SFX Ct ti l .
SFX Ct ti la .
SFX Ct ti lo .
SFX Ct ti li .
SFX Ct obrati beru .
SFX Ct obrati berem .
SFX Ct obrati bereš .
SFX Ct obrati bere .
SFX Ct obrati beremo .
SFX Ct obrati berete .
SFX Ct obrati berut .
SFX Ct ti h .
SFX Ct ti še .
SFX Ct ti hmo .
SFX Ct ti ste .
SFX Ct ti hu .
SFX Ct obrati beri .
SFX Ct obrati berimo .
SFX Ct obrati berite .
SFX Ct obrati beruči .
SFX Ct obrati beručego .
SFX Ct obrati beručemu .
SFX Ct obrati beručim .
SFX Ct obrati beručem .
SFX Ct obrati beručih .
SFX Ct obrati beručimi .
SFX Ct obrati beruča .
SFX Ct obrati beruču .
SFX Ct obrati beručej .
SFX Ct obrati beručeju .
SFX Ct obrati beruče .
SFX Ct obrati beremy .
SFX Ct obrati beremogo .
SFX Ct obrati beremomu .
SFX Ct obrati beremym .
SFX Ct obrati beremom .
SFX Ct obrati beremo .
SFX Ct obrati berema .
SFX Ct obrati beremu .
SFX Ct obrati beremoj .
SFX Ct obrati beremoju .
SFX Ct obrati beremi .
SFX Ct obrati bereme .
SFX Ct obrati beremyh .
SFX Ct obrati beremym .
SFX Ct obrati beremymi .
SFX Ct ti vši .
SFX Ct ti všego .
SFX Ct ti všemu .
SFX Ct ti všim .
SFX Ct ti všem .
SFX Ct ti vših .
SFX Ct ti všimi .
SFX Ct ti vša .
SFX Ct ti všu .
SFX Ct ti všej .
SFX Ct ti všeju .
SFX Ct ti vše .
SFX Ct ti ny .
SFX Ct ti nogo .
SFX Ct ti nomu .
SFX Ct ti nym .
SFX Ct ti nom .
SFX Ct ti ni .
SFX Ct ti ne .
SFX Ct ti nyh .
SFX Ct ti nymi .
SFX Ct ti na .
SFX Ct ti nu .
SFX Ct ti noj .
SFX Ct ti noju .
SFX Ct ti no .
SFX Ct ti nje/xPxE .
SFX Ct ti nja/xPxE .
SFX Ct ti nju/xPxE .
SFX Ct ti njem/xPxE .
SFX Ct ti nij/xPxE .
SFX Ct ti njam/xPxE .
SFX Ct ti njami/xPxE .
SFX Ct ti njah/xPxE .

SFX Cu Y 6
SFX Cu 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Cu i o/xPxBxO .
SFX Cu 0 j/xPxE .
SFX Cu i ah/xPxE .
SFX Cu i am/xPxE .
SFX Cu i ami/xPxE .

SFX Cv Y 6
SFX Cv 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Cv 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX Cv 0 a/xPxE .
SFX Cv 0 u/xPxE .
SFX Cv 0 om/xPxE .
SFX Cv g že/xPxE .
